Rhode Island, session 2025, SB870.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 16 of the General Laws entitled "EDUCATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 117
BUILDING OPPORTUNITIES IN OUT-OF-SCHOOL TIME
16-117-1. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "building opportunities in out-of-school time".
16-117-2. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to provide funding to support comprehensive and effective
afterschool, school vacation, summer learning and workforce development programming for
students in grades kindergarten through twelve (K-12) and professional development that provides
specialized training for staff employed by out-of-school time (“OST”) programs, capacity-building
initiatives, strategies to increase community engagement and program participation, and impact
chronic absenteeism.
16-117-3. Funding.
(a) The general assembly shall allocate no less than four million dollars ($4,000,000) in
fiscal year 2025-2026 budget to invest in:
(1) Targeted professional development that provides specialized training for staff
employed by out-of-school time (“OST”) programs, capacity building initiatives, strategies to
increase community engagement and program participation, and impact chronic absenteeism;

(2) Program assessment and supports to ensure all out-of-school time (“OST”) programs
show strong outcomes for youth and continuous planning for improvement; and
(3) Workforce development funding to train and retain a pipeline of high-quality youth
development professionals to enter the field.
(b) Recipients of funding may include nonprofit organizations, local governments, and
local education authorities.
16-117-4. Allocation and eligibility.
(a) The Rhode Island afterschool network, through their fiscal sponsor, the Rhode Island
foundation, shall allocate no less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to provide
professional development and no less than three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000)
to create a competitive request for proposals process to allocate funding for each fiscal year in
which funds may be appropriated by the general assembly.
(b) Only programs that adhere to the Rhode Island afterschool quality standards and
indicators shall be funded.
(c) Applicants shall detail funds received from all public sources for existing afterschool,
summer learning and workforce development programs and the eligibility of students and programs
served by the funds.
(d) Priority shall be given to those programs that seek to support:
(1) Equity, diversity, inclusion and accessibility;
(2) Low-income families, youth with disabilities, multi-language learners, and youth and
families who have limited access to local programs and services; and
(3) Offering youth a broad array of opportunities, including educational and enrichment
programs. Social emotional learning, civic engagement, and workforce development supported
through STEM (science, technology, engineering and math), and arts to prepare youth for academic
success.
(e) The Rhode Island afterschool network through their fiscal sponsor, the Rhode Island
foundation, shall consult with key stakeholders that include, but are not limited to, the department
of education, the department of human services, and the office of postsecondary education to
maximize the criteria for provision of services.
16-117-5. Reporting.
The Rhode Island afterschool network through their fiscal sponsor, the Rhode Island
foundation, shall send a written report to the general assembly and the governor no later than
December 31 of each year on the status and progress of the programs authorized by this chapter.
LC002532 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002532
========
LC002532 - Page 3 of 4